Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201466-6,102
Gallon equivalent,
defined.

Gallon equivalent means:

(1) For compressed natural gas, the amount
of compressed
natural gas that is deemed to be the energy equivalent of a gallon of gasoline according
to the National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 130 entitled Uniform Regulation for the Method
of Sale of Commodities, Paragraph 2.27.1.3; or

(2) For liquefied
natural gas, the amount of liquefied natural gas that is deemed to be the
energy equivalent of a gallon of diesel fuel at diesel fuel's lower heating
value of one hundred twenty-eight thousand seven hundred British thermal units,
which amount shall be equal to six and six-hundredths pounds of liquefied
natural gas.

Laws 1995, LB 182, § 6;

Laws 2014, LB867, § 6.